Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.255

Payment of fair value to dissenting member or shareholder.

Notwithstanding any provision in this chapter for the payment of fair value to a dissenting member or shareholder, (1) the articles of incorporation may provide that a dissenting member or shareholder shall be limited to a return of a lesser amount, but in no event shall a dissenting member or shareholder be limited to a return of less than the consideration paid to the corporation for the membership or shares which he or she holds unless the fair value of the membership or shares is less than the consideration paid to the corporation, and (2) the fair value payable to a dissenting member of a consumer cooperative shall be a fixed amount equal to the consideration paid to the corporation for the member's current membership unless the articles of incorporation expressly provide for a greater or lesser amount.

[ 2001 c 271 s 15; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 51.]